Oklahoma, session 2025, SB880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1873, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 88, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1873), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1873. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2025, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Board of Licensed Alcohol and Drug
Counselors, consisting of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the
Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, as follows:
provided by subsection B of this section.
B. 1. a. Six members who shall be alcohol and drug
counselors certified by an entity recognized to do
professional alcohol and drug counseling certification
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB880 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

in this state; provided, however, five of such members
shall subsequently secure licensure and one such
member shall subsequently secure certification,
pursuant to the provisions of the Licensed Alcohol and
Drug Counselors Act, no later than January 1, 2005.
b. Thereafter, five Five members shall be licensed
alcohol and drug counselors at the time of
appointment, and one member shall be certified as an
alcohol and drug counselor at the time of appointment.
c. Pursuant to. Each such member shall be licensed or
certified in good standing and shall have at least
three (3) years of experience in the practice of
alcohol and drug counseling in this state. Of the
members appointed under the provisions of this
paragraph, the Governor shall appoint:
(1) a. four members from a list of names submitted by the
Oklahoma Drug and Alcohol Professional Counselors
Counselor Association,
(2) b. one member from a list of names submitted by the
Oklahoma Substance Abuse Services Alliance Oklahoma
Behavioral Health Association, and
(3) c. one member from a list of names submitted by the
Oklahoma Citizen Advocates for Recovery and Treatment
Transformation Association.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB880 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d.
2. One member shall be appointed from and shall represent the
general public. Such member shall be a resident of this state who
has attained the age of majority and shall not be, nor shall ever
have been, a licensed or certified alcohol and drug counselor, or
the spouse of a licensed or certified alcohol and drug counselor, or
a person who has ever had any material financial interest in the
provision of alcohol and drug counseling services or has engaged in
any activity directly related to the practice of alcohol and drug
counseling.
2. The composition of the Board shall include five members who
hold a master’s or higher degree and one member whose highest degree
held is a bachelor’s degree.
3. The Governor shall appoint the members to the Board no later
than July 1, 2004.
B. Each member of the Board appointed as a licensed alcohol and
drug counselor shall:
1. Be certified or licensed to engage in the practice of
alcohol and drug counseling in this state and shall be in good
standing; and
2. Have at least three (3) years of experience in the practice
of alcohol and drug counseling in this state.
C. Two of the members initially appointed shall serve three-
year terms; two shall serve four-year terms and three shall serve
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB880 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

five -year terms, as designated by the Governor. Thereafter, the The
terms of all members shall be five (5) years.
D. A vacancy on the Board shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.
Members may succeed themselves but shall serve no more than two
consecutive terms. Each member shall serve until a successor is
appointed and qualified.
E. Members of the Board may be removed from office for one or
more of the following reasons:
1. The refusal or inability for any reason to perform the
duties of a Board member in an efficient, responsible and
professional manner;
2. The misuse of office for pecuniary or material gain or for
personal advantage for self or another;
3. A violation of the laws or rules governing the practice of
alcohol and drug counseling; or
4. Conviction of a felony as verified by a certified copy of
the record of the court of conviction.
F. Members of the Board shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses as
provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB880 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB880 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)